Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1524
Deceptive trade practice.

A violation of section 59-1520 shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act and, in addition to any remedies or penalties set forth in sections 59-1519 to 59-1525, shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a violation under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.

Laws 2001, LB 358, § 6.

Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act, see section 87-306.